src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-pula_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 



  Noun - пула: # Ordinary nouns 'tail' - full paradigm including MWN
     пула+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: пула
     пула+N+SP+Gen+Indef: пулонь
     пула+N+SP+Abl+Indef: пулода
     пула+N+SP+Dat+Indef: пулонди
     пула+N+SP+Abe+Indef: пулофтома
     пула+N+SP+Cmpr+Indef: пулошка
     пула+N+SP+Ine+Indef: пулоса
     пула+N+SP+Ela+Indef: пулоста
     пула+N+SP+Ill+Indef: пулос
     пула+N+SP+Prl+Indef: пулова
     пула+N+SP+Tra+Indef: пулокс
     пула+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: пулозе
     пула+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: пулоне
     пула+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: пулозень
     пула+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: пулонень
     пула+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [пулозти, пулозенди]
     пула+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: пулоненди
     пула+N+SP+Abl+PxSg1: пулодон
     пула+N+SP+Abe+PxSg1: пулофтомон
     пула+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg1: пулошкан
     пула+N+SP+Ine+PxSg1: пулосон
     пула+N+SP+Ela+PxSg1: пулостон
     пула+N+SP+Ill+PxSg1: пулозон
     пула+N+SP+Prl+PxSg1: пулован
     пула+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: пулоце
     пула+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: пулотне
     пула+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: пулоцень
     пула+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: пулотнень
     пула+N+SP+Abl+PxSg2: пулодот
     пула+N+SP+Abe+PxSg2: пулофтомот
     пула+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg2: пулошкат
     пула+N+SP+Ine+PxSg2: пулосот
     пула+N+SP+Ela+PxSg2: пулостот
     пула+N+SP+Ill+PxSg2: пулозт
     пула+N+SP+Prl+PxSg2: пуловат
     пула+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: пулоц
     пула+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: пулонза
     пула+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: пулонц
     пула+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: пулонзон
     пула+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: пулонцты
     пула+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: пулонзонды
     пула+N+SP+Abl+PxSg3: пулодонза
     пула+N+SP+Abe+PxSg3: пулофтомонза
     пула+N+SP+Cmpr+PxSg3: пулошканза
     пула+N+SP+Ine+PxSg3: пулосонза
     пула+N+SP+Ela+PxSg3: пулостонза
     пула+N+SP+Ill+PxSg3: пулозонза
     пула+N+SP+Prl+PxSg3: пулованза
     пула+N+SP+Nom+PxPl1: пулоньке
     пула+N+SP+Gen+PxPl1: пулоньконь
     пула+N+SP+Dat+PxPl1: пулоньконди
     пула+N+SP+Abl+PxPl1: пулодонк
     пула+N+SP+Abe+PxPl1: пулофтомонк
     пула+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl1: пулошканк
     пула+N+SP+Ine+PxPl1: пулосонк
     пула+N+SP+Ela+PxPl1: пулостонк
     пула+N+SP+Ill+PxPl1: пулозонк
     пула+N+SP+Prl+PxPl1: пулованк
     пула+N+SP+Nom+PxPl2: пулонте
     пула+N+SP+Gen+PxPl2: пулонтень
     пула+N+SP+Dat+PxPl2: пулонтенди
     пула+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2: пулодонт
     пула+N+SP+Abe+PxPl2: пулофтомонт
     пула+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl2: пулошкант
     пула+N+SP+Ine+PxPl2: пулосонт
     пула+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2: пулостонт
     пула+N+SP+Ill+PxPl2: пулозонт
     пула+N+SP+Prl+PxPl2: пуловант
     пула+N+SP+Nom+PxPl3: пулосна
     пула+N+SP+Gen+PxPl3: пулоснон
     пула+N+SP+Dat+PxPl3: пулоснонды
     пула+N+SP+Abl+PxPl3: пулодост
     пула+N+SP+Abe+PxPl3: пулофтомост
     пула+N+SP+Cmpr+PxPl3: пулошкаст
     пула+N+SP+Ine+PxPl3: пулосост
     пула+N+SP+Ela+PxPl3: пулостост
     пула+N+SP+Ill+PxPl3: пулозост
     пула+N+SP+Prl+PxPl3: пуловаст
     пула+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: пулот
     пула+N+Sg+Nom+Def: пулось
     пула+N+Sg+Gen+Def: пулоть
     пула+N+Sg+Dat+Def: пулоти
     пула+N+Pl+Nom+Def: пулотне
     пула+N+Pl+Gen+Def: пулотнень
     пула+N+Pl+Dat+Def: пулотненди    
     пула+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: пулоня
